Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-242
Cemeteries; ownership of lots; monuments.

A primary city may limit the number of cemetery lots which shall be owned by the same person at the same time. It may prescribe rules for enclosing, adorning, and erecting monuments and tombstones on cemetery lots and prohibit any diversion of the use of such lots and any improper adornment thereof, but no religious test shall be made as to the ownership of such lots, the burial therein, nor the ornamentation of graves or lots.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XLII, p. 138;

R.S.1913, § 4452;

C.S.1922, § 3837;

C.S.1929, § 15-240;

R.S.1943, § 15-242.